Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2866, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2866. A. For purposes of reporting to the State Board
of Equalization the ratio derived from comparing the assessed value
of the real property of each county to the full or fair cash value
of such real property, the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall conduct and
publish an equalization ratio study for each county annually in
accordance with the requirements of this section.
B. The equalization ratio study shall be conducted in a manner
that ensures:
1. the The ratio of assessed value to the fair cash value of
properties in a sample extracted from a county is expressed as a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1212 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

medi an of the ratios determined for all properties included in the
sample;
2. sample Sample data gathered for purposes of establishing the
fair cash value of properties within the sample relates to the
applicable assessment date of the study in a manner that produces
reliable ratio study results;
3. sample Sample sizes of sufficient numbers to produce an
estimated ratio for a use category within a county or a ratio for an
entire county at a ratio that accurately estimates the true, but
unknown, assessment level;
4. appraisals Appraisals selected for inclusion in the ratio
study are representative of the use category or stratum of
properties included in the sample;
5. sales Sales files containing adequate information are
developed and maintained for purposes of appraisals; and
6. uniformity Uniformity of assessments within a use category
or stratum for a county do not exceed a coefficient of dispersion
value of twenty percent (20%).
C. Upon completion of the study required by this section,
counties found to have a median assessment level within the
International Association of Assessing Officers (IAAO) standard
range of ninety hundredths (0.9) to one and ten hundredths (1.10) of
the assessment percentage of the county, as authorized pursuant to
Section 8 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution, for each
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1212 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prop erty classification, and to have median assessed ratios within a
deviation range of one and fifty hundredths percent (1.50%) between
each property classification, shall be certified to the State Board
of Equalization as being in compliance with the equalization ratio
study requirements.
D. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall provide for a computer
system that permits the equalization ratio study to be conducted
pursuant to the requirements of this section. Such computer system
shall be designed to permit monitoring and analysis of assessment
performance in the several counties and to detect noncompliance with
legal standards for valuation of taxable property in order to
fulfill the duties imposed by Section 2830 of this title. The
provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to authorize
the Oklahoma Tax Commission to install a mainframe computer capable
of remote monitoring of or making inputs into computers in the
offices of the various county assessors.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON REVENUE AND TAXATION
February 23, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1212 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)